nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
perro N ;
gato N ;
guitarra N ;
libro N ;
ventana N ;
rueda N ;
llave N ;
camisa N ;
escuela N ;
hombre N ;

!Lexicon with Noun POS tag
LEXICON N
+N: N-suff ;

!Lexicon with Noun suffixes:
LEXICON N-suff
+Sg:    # ;
+Pl:s   # ;
